Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2602.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; pay increase The sum of $24,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for a ten percent pay increase for all department employees.